Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1517
Licensee; disciplinary
action; additional grounds.

In addition to the
grounds for disciplinary action found in sections 38-178 and 38-179, a credential
issued under the Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act may
be denied, refused renewal, limited, revoked, or suspended or have other disciplinary
measures taken against it in accordance with section 38-196 when the applicant
or credential holder is found guilty of any of the following acts or offenses:

(1) Fitting and selling a hearing instrument to
a child under the age of sixteen who has not been examined and cleared for
hearing instrument use within a six-month
period by an otolaryngologist without a signed waiver by the legal guardian.
This subdivision shall not apply to the replacement with an identical model
of any hearing instrument within one year
of its purchase;

(2) Any other condition or acts which violate the Trade Practice
Rules for the Hearing Aid Industry of the Federal Trade Commission or the
Food and Drug Administration; or

(3) Violation of any provision of the Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act.

Laws 1969, c. 767, § 12, p. 2909;

Laws 1986, LB 701, § 10;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 157;

Laws 1991, LB 456, § 37;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 51;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-4712;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 581;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 35.